Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 24. Northern Virginia Transportation District Fund and Program.

§ 33.2-2400.
Northern Virginia Transportation District Fund.

There is hereby created in the Department of the Treasury a special nonreverting fund that shall be a part of the Transportation Trust Fund and that shall be known as the Northern Virginia Transportation District Fund, referred to in this chapter as “the Fund,” consisting of transfers of $40 million from the Commonwealth Transportation Fund pursuant to subsection C of §

33.2-1524

. The Fund shall also include any public rights-of-way use fees appropriated by the General Assembly; any state or local revenues, including any funds distributed pursuant to §

33.2-366

, that may be deposited into the Fund pursuant to a contract between a jurisdiction participating in the Northern Virginia Transportation District Program and the Commonwealth Transportation Board; and any other funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly and designated for the Fund and all interest, dividends, and appreciation that may accrue thereto. Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to the general fund, but shall remain in the Fund, subject to the determination by the Commonwealth Transportation Board that a Category 2, 3, or 4 project may be funded.

Allocations from the Fund may be paid (i) to any authority, locality, or commission for the purposes of paying the costs of the Northern Virginia Transportation District Program, which consists of the following: the Fairfax County Parkway, the Route 234 Bypass, Metrorail capital improvements attributable to Fairfax County including Metro parking expansions, Metrorail capital improvements including the Franconia-Springfield Metrorail Station and new rail car purchases, the Route 7 improvements in Loudoun County and Fairfax County, the Route 50/Courthouse Road interchange improvements in Arlington County, the Route 28/Route 625 interchange improvements in Loudoun County, Metrorail capital improvements attributable to the City of Alexandria including the King Street Metrorail Station access, Metrorail capital improvements attributable to Arlington County including Ballston Station improvements, the Route 15 safety improvements in Loudoun County, the Route 28 parallel roads in Loudoun County, the Route 28/Sterling Boulevard interchange in Loudoun County, the Route 1/Route 123 interchange improvements in Prince William County, the Lee Highway improvements in the City of Fairfax, the Route 123 improvements in Fairfax County, the Telegraph Road improvements in Fairfax County, the Route 123 Occoquan River Bridge, Gallows Road in Fairfax County, the Route 1/Route 234 interchange improvements in Prince William County, the Potomac and Rappahannock Transportation Commission bus replacement program, and the Dulles Corridor Enhanced Transit program and (ii) for Category 4 projects as provided in § 2 of the act or acts authorizing the issuance of Bonds for the Northern Virginia Transportation District Program.

On or before July 15, 1994, $19 million shall be transferred to the Fund. Such transfer shall be made by the issuance of a treasury loan at no interest in the amount of $19 million in the event such an amount is not included for the Fund in the general appropriation act enacted by the 1994 Session of the General Assembly. Such treasury loan shall be repaid from the Commonwealth Transportation Fund pursuant to subsection C of §

33.2-1524

.

Beginning in fiscal year 2019, $20 million each year shall be transferred from the Fund to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Capital Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-3401

.

Beginning in fiscal year 2021, $20 million each year shall be transferred from the Fund to the Northern Virginia Transportation Authority Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-2509

.

History.

1993, c. 391, § 58.1-815.1; 1994, cc. 470, 597; 1998, cc. 740, 761; 1999, c. 538; 2002, c. 799; 2003, c. 337; 2005, c. 621; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684; 2018, cc. 854, 856; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 5 provides: “That each county or city that is a member of the Potomac Rappahannock Transportation Commission, but not a member of the Northern Virginia Transportation Authority, as of January 1, 2018, shall expend or disburse for the support of public transportation an amount that is at least equal to the average annual amount expended or disbursed for such purposes by the county or city, excluding bond proceeds or debt service payments and federal or state grants, between July 1, 2015, and June 30, 2018.”

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for §§

33.2-214.4

,

33.2-286

, and

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-638

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall not become effective until 30 days after the District of Columbia and the State of Maryland each enact legislation or take actions to provide dedicated funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA). The percentage of funding provided by the Commonwealth for its share of WMATA funding pursuant to this act beginning with the fiscal year that this act becomes effective, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be proportional to the amount of funding provided by the District of Columbia and Maryland relative to their respective share of WMATA funding in that fiscal year.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that the contingency occurred April 25, 2018,
and the effective date is therefore May 25, 2018.

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 16 provides: “That should any provision of this act changing the allocation of existing revenues in the Code of Virginia be declared invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the amendments to the relevant section of the Code of Virginia made by this act shall expire, and such section shall revert to the language in the Code of Virginia in effect on January 1, 2018.” As of January 1, 2018, the section read as follows:

“

§

33.2-2400

. Northern Virginia Transportation District Fund.

“A. There is hereby created in the Department of the Treasury a special nonreverting fund that shall be a part of the Transportation Trust Fund and that shall be known as the Northern Virginia Transportation District Fund, referred to in this chapter as ‘the Fund,’ consisting of transfers pursuant to §

58.1-816

of annual collections of the state recordation taxes attributable to the Cities of Alexandria, Fairfax, Falls Church, Manassas, and Manassas Park and the Counties of Arlington, Fairfax, Loudoun, and Prince William; however, this dedication shall not affect the local recordation taxes under subsection B of §

58.1-802

and §

58.1-814

. The Fund shall also include any public rights-of-way use fees appropriated by the General Assembly; any state or local revenues, including any funds distributed pursuant to §

33.2-366

, that may be deposited into the Fund pursuant to a contract between a jurisdiction participating in the Northern Virginia Transportation District Program and the Commonwealth Transportation Board; and any other funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly and designated for the Fund and all interest, dividends, and appreciation that may accrue thereto. Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to the general fund, but shall remain in the Fund, subject to the determination by the Commonwealth Transportation Board that a Category 2, 3, or 4 project may be funded.

“B. Allocations from the Fund may be paid (i) to any authority, locality, or commission for the purposes of paying the costs of the Northern Virginia Transportation District Program, which consists of the following: the Fairfax County Parkway, the Route 234 Bypass, Metrorail capital improvements attributable to Fairfax County including Metro parking expansions, Metrorail capital improvements including the Franconia-Springfield Metrorail Station and new rail car purchases, the Route 7 improvements in Loudoun County and Fairfax County, the Route 50/Courthouse Road interchange improvements in Arlington County, the Route 28/Route 625 interchange improvements in Loudoun County, Metrorail capital improvements attributable to the City of Alexandria including the King Street Metrorail Station access, Metrorail capital improvements attributable to Arlington County including Ballston Station improvements, the Route 15 safety improvements in Loudoun County, the Route 28 parallel roads in Loudoun County, the Route 28/Sterling Boulevard interchange in Loudoun County, the Route 1/Route 123 interchange improvements in Prince William County, the Lee Highway improvements in the City of Fairfax, the Route 123 improvements in Fairfax County, the Telegraph Road improvements in Fairfax County, the Route 123 Occoquan River Bridge, Gallows Road in Fairfax County, the Route 1/Route 234 interchange improvements in Prince William County, the Potomac-Rappahannock Transportation Commission bus replacement program, and the Dulles Corridor Enhanced Transit program and (ii) for Category 4 projects as provided in § 2 of the act or acts authorizing the issuance of Bonds for the Northern Virginia Transportation District Program.

“C. On or before July 15, 1994, $19 million shall be transferred to the Fund. Such transfer shall be made by the issuance of a treasury loan at no interest in the amount of $19 million in the event such an amount is not included for the Fund in the general appropriation act enacted by the 1994 Session of the General Assembly. Such treasury loan shall be repaid from the Commonwealth’s portion of the state recordation tax imposed by Chapter 8 (§

58.1-800

et seq.) of Title 58.1 designated for the Fund by this section and §

58.1-816

.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 deleted “33.2-362,

33.2-364

, or” preceding “33.2-366” in second sentence of subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 854 and 856 are identical, and added subsection D. For contingent effective and contingent expiration dates, see notes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, substituted “$40 million from the Commonwealth Transportation Fund pursuant to subsection C of §

33.2-1524

” for “pursuant to §

58.1-816

of annual collections of the state recordation taxes attributable to the Cities of Alexandria, Fairfax, Falls Church, Manassas, and Manassas Park and the Counties of Arlington, Fairfax, Loudoun, and Prince William; however, this dedication shall not affect the local recordation taxes under subsection B of §

58.1-802

and §

58.1-814

” in subsection A; substituted “Potomac and Rappahannock” for “Potomac-Rappahannock” in subsection B; substituted “Commonwealth Transportation Fund pursuant to subsection C of §

33.2-1524

” for “Commonwealth’s portion of the state recordation tax imposed by Chapter 8 (§

58.1-800

et seq.) of Title 58.1 designated for the Fund by this section and §

58.1-816

” in subsection C; and inserted subsection E.

§ 33.2-2401.
Northern Virginia Transportation District Program.

The General Assembly declares it to be in the public interest that the economic development needs and economic growth potential of Northern Virginia be addressed by a special transportation program to provide for the costs of providing an adequate, modern, safe, and efficient transportation network in Northern Virginia that shall be known as the Northern Virginia Transportation District Program (the Program), including environmental and engineering studies, rights-of-way acquisition, construction, improvements to all modes of transportation, and financing costs. The Program consists of the projects listed in clause (i) of subsection B of §

33.2-2400

.

Allocations to the Program from the Fund shall be made annually by the Commonwealth Transportation Board for the creation and enhancement of a safe and efficient transportation system connecting the communities, businesses, places of employment, and residences of the Commonwealth, thereby enhancing the economic development potential, employment opportunities, mobility, and quality of life in the Commonwealth.

Except in the event that the Fund is insufficient to pay for the costs of the Program, allocations to the Program shall not diminish or replace allocations made from other sources or diminish allocations to which any district, system, or locality would be entitled under other provisions of this title but shall be supplemental to other allocations to the end that transportation improvements in the Northern Virginia Transportation District may be accelerated and augmented. Allocations under this subsection shall be limited to projects specified in subdivision 12 of §

33.2-1700

.

The Commonwealth Transportation Board may expend such funds from all sources as may be lawfully available to initiate the Program and to support bonds and other obligations referenced in subsection E and in subsection D of §

33.2-2400

.

The Commonwealth Transportation Board is authorized to receive, dedicate, or use (i) first from revenues received from the Fund; (ii) to the extent required, funds available for distribution after providing for subsection A of §

33.2-358

; (iii) to the extent required, legally available revenues of the Transportation Trust Fund; and (iv) such other funds that may be appropriated by the General Assembly for the payment of bonds or other obligations, including interest thereon, issued in furtherance of the Program. No such bond or other obligations shall pledge the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth.

History.

1993, c. 391, § 33.1-221.1:3; 1994, cc. 470, 597; 1998, cc. 740, 761; 1999, c. 538; 2002, c. 799; 2003, c. 337; 2005, c. 621; 2014, c. 805; 2018, cc. 854, 856; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for §§

33.2-214.4

,

33.2-286

, and

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-638

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall not become effective until 30 days after the District of Columbia and the State of Maryland each enact legislation or take actions to provide dedicated funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA). The percentage of funding provided by the Commonwealth for its share of WMATA funding pursuant to this act beginning with the fiscal year that this act becomes effective, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be proportional to the amount of funding provided by the District of Columbia and Maryland relative to their respective share of WMATA funding in that fiscal year.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that the contingency occurred April 25, 2018,
and the effective date is therefore May 25, 2018.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 854 and 856 are identical, and added “and in subsection D of §

33.2-2400

” in subsection D; and rewrote clause (ii) in subsection E.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and substituted “subsection A” for “subsection B” in clause (ii) of subsection E.